Louisiana, session 2026, HB1201.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 24:31(A), 31.1(C)(2) and (E), and 503(B) are hereby amended and
reenacted to read as follows:
§31. Compensation of members; per diem election
A.(1) The compensation of the members of the legislature shall be equal to
the rate allowable for per diem deduction under 26 U.S.C. 162(h)(1)(B)(ii) for the
location of the state capital during their attendance on that body and for no more than
ten days a month when engaged in official legislative business on days not in
attendance on the body.
(2) The per diem allowance for days engaged in official legislative business
but not in attendance on the body shall be paid only upon the filing of a voucher by
the member with the respective presiding officer for each such day and approval of
the presiding officer.
* * *
Page 1 of 4
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1201 ENROLLED
§31.1. Salary for members; expense allowance; mileage allowance
* * *
C.
* * *
(2)(a) During the interim between sessions each member shall also be paid,
for actual attendance at meetings of legislative committees of which he is a member
and for any meeting or activity when attending to official legislative business for no
more than ten days per month, a mileage allowance at the rate provided in Paragraph
(1) of this Subsection for actual travel to and from the site of such meetings or
activities.
(b) Mileage allowance for legislative committee meetings provided for in
this Paragraph shall be paid only upon the filing by the member of a voucher with
the respective presiding officer of a voucher for each such meeting or activity. The
legislature or either house may, by appropriate resolution, provide that no mileage
allowance shall be paid in the case of particular committees, or particular meetings,
or activities.
* * *
E.(1) In addition to the salary, compensation, and all other allowances
provided by law for members of the legislature, each member of the legislature shall
be paid a monthly expense allowance, as referred to in R.S. 11:403(10), in the
amount of five hundred dollars per month for expenses in connection with the
holding or conduct of their office. Warrants for the payment of such allowance shall
be in accordance with, and subject to, Subsection B of this Section.
(2) The expense allowance provided for in this Subsection shall be adjusted
for inflation on January first of each year by the change in the consumer price index -
U.S. city average for all urban consumers (CPI-U) as prepared by the United States
Department of Labor, Bureau of Labor Statistics, applied annually and shall reflect
the change, if any, since the amount was last modified, provided that any adjustment
in a monthly amount shall only be made in whole increments of one hundred dollars.
* * *
Page 2 of 4
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1201 ENROLLED
§503. Expenses
* * *
B. The president members of the Senate and speaker of the members of the
House of Representatives shall be entitled to be reimbursed for expenses incurred in
maintaining a residence in the capital city, in an amount not to exceed one thousand
dollars per month, upon filing an itemized statement of expenses and appropriate
invoices or receipts supporting the same with the chief clerical officer of their
respective house of the legislature. The Legislative Budgetary Control Council may
promulgate rules concerning expenses pursuant to this Subsection including an
annual election for reimbursement up to the monthly limit as an expense allowance
or through an accountable plan maintained in accordance with Title 26 of the United
States Code.
(2) The expense allowance provided for in this Subsection shall be adjusted
for inflation on January first of each year by the change in the consumer price index-
U.S. city average for all urban consumers (CPI-U) as prepared by the United States
Department of Labor, Bureau of Labor Statistics, applied annually and shall reflect
the change, if any, since the amount was last modified, provided that any adjustment
in a monthly amount shall only be made in whole increments of one hundred dollars.
* * *
Section 2. R.S. 36:10(B) is hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§10. Statewide elected officials; salary compensation
* * *
B.(1) The salary of each statewide elected official, except the governor, shall
be one hundred fifteen thousand dollars, payable monthly upon the statewide elected
official's own warrant.
(2) Each statewide elected official, except the governor, shall be entitled to
a monthly unvouchered housing allowance for renting or leasing a residence in the
capital city of one thousand dollars per month.
(3) Each statewide elected official, except the governor, shall be entitled to
a monthly unvouchered expense allowance of five hundred dollars per month
Page 3 of 4
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1201 ENROLLED
payable upon the statewide elected official's own warrant. The expense allowance
shall be adjusted for inflation on January first of each year by the change in the
consumer price index - U.S. city average for all urban consumers (CPI-U) as
prepared by the United States Department of Labor, Bureau of Labor Statistics,
applied annually and shall reflect the change, if any, since the amount was last
modified, provided that any adjustment in a monthly amount shall only be made in
whole increments of one hundred dollars.
Section 3. This Act shall become effective at noon on January 10, 2028.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 4 of 4
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.